Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.290

Tortious conduct by department of fish and wildlife officers engaged in private law enforcement off-duty employment—No state liability.

(1) The state is not liable for tortious conduct by department of fish and wildlife officers that occurs while such officers are engaged in private law enforcement off-duty employment.

(2) Upon petition of the state any suit, for which immunity is granted to the state under subsection (1) of this section, shall be dismissed.

(3) Department of fish and wildlife officers engaged in private law enforcement off-duty employment shall notify, in writing, prior to such employment, anyone who employs department of fish and wildlife officers in private off-duty employment of the specific provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

[ 2023 c 250 s 2.]